finished/xty.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [PFV] [LGSPEC2] [IRR] [STAT] [IPFV] [NEG] [PFV] [LGSPEC1] @U.NEG@


LEXICON Root 
Lemma;


LEXICON Lemma
nu¹na⁴ 									ClassA; 
kiʔ¹bi³ 								ClassB;
ke¹ta³ 									ClassB;
ka¹an³ 									ClassB;
ko¹yo³ 									ClassB;
ta¹an³ 									ClassB;
ndo¹o³ 									ClassB;
kwa¹xin³								ClassB;
kwi¹so³ 								ClassB;
kwaʔ¹a³ 								ClassB;
kwiʔ¹nu³ 								ClassB;
na¹ma³ 									ClassB;
nde¹e³ 									ClassB;
kaʔ¹un³ 								ClassB;
ku³-ndiʔ¹i³ 							ClassB;
to¹o³ 									ClassB;
niʔ¹i³ 									ClassB;
ka¹ku³ 									ClassB;
xi¹nu³ 									ClassB;
ke¹e³ 									ClassB;



LEXICON ClassA 
[V][IRR][NEG]:A4NG						#; 
[V][IPFV]:A4IP 							#; 


LEXICON ClassB
[V][IPFV]:A13IP 						#; 
